Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.900.050

Title, chapter, section headings not part of law.

Title headings, chapter headings, and section or subsection headings, as used in this title, Title 28B RCW, do not constitute any part of the law.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.98.050. Formerly RCW 28B.98.050.]